Wisconsin, session 2025, AB21.
do enact as follows:AB21,13Section 1. 38.14 (2) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB21,2,2438.14 (2) (d) 1. Lease facilities to others for school purposes. The district 1board may not enter into a lease under this subdivision after June 30, 1999, except 2a lease of facilities for the operation of a child care center.AB21,23Section 2. Initial applicability.AB21,2,54(1) This act first applies to a lease entered into on the effective date of this 5subsection.AB21,2,66